Hawaii statutes.
§309H-4 Hawaii health corps first responder
service obligation. If an emergency or disaster proclaimed under chapter 127A
occurs, physicians, physician assistants, and nurse practitioners participating
in the Hawaii health corps program may be ordered into service by the governor
as first responders to serve in areas of the State and in a capacity determined
by the director of health. [L 2012, c 187, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 111, §13]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next